Utah statutes.
48-2c-108 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Reservation of name.

(1)  The exclusive right to register a name for use by a company may be reserved by any person.

(2) (a)  The reservation described in Subsection (1) shall be made by filing with the division an application signed by the applicant.

(b)  If the division finds that the name is available for use by a company, the division shall reserve the name exclusively for the applicant for a period of 120 days.  The name reservation may be renewed for any number of subsequent periods of 120 days.

(c)  The reserved name may be transferred to any other person by filing with the division a notice of the transfer that:

(i)  is signed by the applicant for whom the name was reserved; and

(ii)  specifies the name and address of the transferee.

